Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Article 9. Miscellaneous Provisions

407.5901.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 365, § 61; 1998, ch 101, § 20, effective March 23, 1998; 2015 ch. 18, § 70, effective June 24, 2015.

407.59015.
Application of KRS 407.5101 to 407.5902.

KRS

407.5101

to

407.5902

applies to proceedings begun on or after June 24, 2015, to establish a support order or determine parentage of a child or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior support order, determination, or agreement, whenever issued or entered.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 365, § 62; 1998, ch. 101, § 20, effective March 23, 1998; 2015 ch. 18, § 71, effective June 24, 2015.

407.5902.
Short title.

KRS

407.5101

to

407.5902

shall be cited as the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 365, § 63; 1998, ch. 101, § 20, effective March 23, 1998.

407.5903.
Severability.

If any provision of KRS

407.5101

to

407.5902

or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of KRS

407.5101

to

407.5902

which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end provisions of KRS 407.5101 to 407.5902 are severable.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 18, § 72, effective June 24, 2015.